North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 3. Other Teacher, Employee Benefits; Child Health Benefits. [Repealed]

§§ 135-32 through 135-33.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981 (Regular Session, 1982), c. 1398, s. 1.

§ 135-34.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 738, s. 29( l ).

§ 135-35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 859, s. 13.17; 1981 (Regular Session, 1982), c. 1398, s. 1.

§ 135-36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981 (Regular Session, 1982), c. 1398, s. 1.

§§ 135-37 through 135-42.1.

Recodified and renumbered as

G.S. 135-43

to 135-47.3.

§ 135-999.

TABLE OF COMPARABLE
SECTIONS FOR
CHAPTER 135, REVISED ARTICLE 3A

Former to Revised Article

Editor’s Note.
— The following table shows G.S. sections from former Chapter 135, Article 3, and their comparable, Chapter 135, revised Article 3A numbers. Article 3A was recodified as Article 3B of Chapter 135 by Session Laws 2011-85,
ss. 2.4 through 2.8, effective January 1, 2012. See Table of Comparable Sections following Article 3A.

Former Revised Section Section 135-37 135-43 135-38 135-43.1 135-38.1 135-43.4 135-39 135-44 135-39.1 135-43.5 135-39.2 135-44.1 135-39.3 135-43.3 135-39.4A 135-44.2 135-39.5 135-44.4 135-39.5A 135-44.4(27) 135-39.6 135-44.5 135-39.6A 135-44.6 135-39.7
135-44.7 135.39.8 135-44.8 135-39.9 135-43.6 135-39.10 135-44.3 135-39.11 135-43.7 135-40 Repealed 135-40.1 Repealed 135-40.2 135-45.2 135-40.3 135-45.4 135-40.3A 135-45.5 135-40.5 135-45.6 135-40.6A Repealed 135-40.7 135-45.8 135-40.7B
135-45.9 135-40.10 135-45.10 135-40.11 135-45.11 135-40.12 135-45.13 135-40.13 135-45.14 135-40.13A 135-45.15 135-40.14 135-45.16 135-41 135-46 135-41.1 135-46.1 135-41.2 135-46.2 135-41.3 135-46.3 135-42 135-47 135-42.1 135-47.1

Click to view